Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1175.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 8, chapter 4, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 8-530.10, to read: START_STATUTE8-530.10. DCS caseworkers; investigations; child photographs; safety plan Each time a department caseworker has contact or interacts with a CHILD who is the subject of a department investigation for an allegation of abuse or neglect, the caseworker shall photograph the child and maintain the photograph in the child's case file. when making a safety plan for a child, the caseworker shall review all PHOTOGRAPHS of the child and consider any decline in the child's appearance or health. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Effective date Section 8-530.10, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, is effective from and after December 31, 2026.